Hawaii, session 2026, GM1108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 11-118, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) If the party fills the vacancy, and so notifies the
chief election officer or clerk not later than 4:30 p.m. on the
third day after the vacancy occurs, [but—note--lator than 4:30
p.m.—on tho fiftieth day prior to a primary or special primary
election or not later than 4:30 p.m.—en^-tehe—teea?tei-eteh—day^-prier
tee—a—speeiaiT—general,—or-special general ■ election, ] the name of
the replacement shall be printed in an available and appropriate
place on the ballot [-r] to the extent reasonably possible, not
necessarily in alphabetical order; provided that the replacement
candidate fills out an application for nomination papers, signs
the proper certifications on the nomination paper, and takes
either an oath or affirmation as provided by law. If the party
fails to fill the vacancy pursuant to this subsection, no
candidate's name shall be printed on the ballot for the party
for that race."
HB LRB 26-0444.docx 1
inmMnHH

Page 2
H.B.
SECTION 2. Section 17-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) In the case of a vacancy, the term of which does not
end at the next succeeding general election:
(1) If it occurs not later than on the tenth day prior to
the close of filing for the next succeeding primary
election, the vacancy shall be filled for the
unexpired term at the next succeeding general
election. The chief election officer shall issue a
proclamation designating the election for filling the
vacancy. All candidates for the unexpired term shall
be nominated and elected in accordance with this
title. Pending the election, the governor shall make
a temporary appointment to fill the vacancy, and the
person so appointed shall serve until the election of
the person duly elected to fill the vacancy. The
governor shall make the appointment from a list of
three prospective appointees submitted by the same
political party as the prior incumbent. The appointee
shall be, at the time of the appointment, and shall
have been, for at least six months immediately prior
HB LRB 26-0444.docx
■■■■■■■■I

Page 3 H.B.
to the appointment, a member of the political party.
The appointee shall, at the time of appointment, be a
resident of the same senate district as the prior
incumbent. If the prior incumbent was not a member of
any political party, the governor shall appoint a
person who is at the time of appointment a resident of
the same senate district as the prior incumbent and is
not and has not been, for at least six months
immediately prior to the appointment, a member of any
political party;
(2) If it occurs later than on the tenth day prior to the
close of filing for the next succeeding primary
election but not later than on the [si-xfe-iGth] day ojE
the close of filing prior to the next succeeding
primary election, or if there are no qualified
candidates for any party or nonpartisan candidates
qualified for the primary election ballot, nominations
for the unexpired term may be filed not later than
4:30 p.m. on the [-fiffeiette] fifty-seventh day prior to
the next succeeding primary election. The chief
election officer shall issue a proclamation
HB LRB 26-0444.docx

Page 4
H.B. NO.
designating the election for filling the vacancy. All
candidates for the unexpired term shall be nominated
and elected in accordance with this title. Pending
the election the governor shall make a temporary
appointment to fill the vacancy and the person
appointed shall serve until the election of the person
duly elected to fill the vacancy. The governor shall
make the appointment from a list of three prospective
appointees submitted by the same political party as
the prior incumbent. The appointee shall be, at the
time of the appointment, and shall have been, for at
least six months immediately prior to the appointment,
a member of the political party. The appointee shall,
at the time of appointment, be a resident of the same
senate district as the prior incumbent. If the prior
incumbent was not a member of any political party, the
governor shall appoint a person who is at the time of
appointment a resident of the same senate district as
the prior incumbent and is not and has not been, for
at least six months immediately prior to the
appointment, a member of any political party;
HB LRB 26-0444.docx
■■■■niiiiHi

Page 5 H.B. NO. ^,0?^
(3) If it occurs after the [sixtieth day] close of filing
prior to the next succeeding primary but not later
than on the [fiftieth] seventieth day prior to the
next succeeding general election, or if there are no
qualified candidates for any party or nonpartisan
candidates in the primary, the vacancy shall be filled
for the unexpired term at the next succeeding general
election. The chief election officer shall issue a
proclamation designating the election for filling the
vacancy. Party candidates for the unexpired senate
term shall be nominated by the county committees of
the parties not later than 4:30 p.m, on the [fortieth]
sixtieth day prior to the general election;
nonpartisan candidates may file nomination papers for
the unexpired term not later than 4:30 p.m. on the
[4e£^feiefeh] sixtieth day prior to the general election
with the nonpartisan candidate who is to be nominated
to be decided by lot, under the supervision of the
chief election officer. The candidates for the
unexpired term shall be elected in accordance with
this title. Pending the election, the governor shall
HB LRB 26-0444.docx

Page 6 H.B.
make a temporary appointment to fill the vacancy, and
the person appointed shall serve until the election of
the person duly elected to fill the vacancy. The
governor shall make the appointment from a list of
three prospective appointees submitted by the same
political party as the prior incumbent. The appointee
shall be, at the time of the appointment, and shall
have been, for at least six months immediately prior
to the appointment, a member of the political party.
The appointee shall, at the time of appointment, be a
resident of the same senate district as the prior
incumbent. If the prior incumbent was not a member of
any political party, the governor shall appoint a
person who is at the time of appointment a resident of
the same senate district as the prior incumbent and is
not and has not been, for at least six months
immediately prior to the appointment, a member of any
political party;
(4) If it occurs after the seventieth day prior
to the next succeeding general election or if no
candidates are nominated, the governor shall make an
HB LRB 26-0444.docx

Page 7 H.B.
appointment to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term
by selecting a person from a list of three prospective
appointees submitted by the same political party as
the prior incumbent. The appointee shall be, at the
time of the appointment, and shall have been, for at
least six months immediately prior to the appointment,
a member of the political party. The appointee shall,
at the time of appointment, be a resident of the same
senate district as the prior incumbent. If the prior
incumbent was not a member of any political party, the
governor shall appoint a person who is at the time of
appointment a resident of the same senate district as
the prior incumbent and is not and has not been, for
at least six months immediately prior to the
appointment, a member of any political party."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
HB LRB 26-0444.docx

Page 8 H.B.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.

INTRODUCED BY:
BY REQUEST
JAN 2 3 2026
HB LRB 26-0444.docx

H.B. NO. 2099
APPROVED this 28th day of April , 2026

HB No. 2099
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: March 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
APR 1 0 2026
Date:
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
Senate of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session of 2026.
Ronald D. Kouchi
President of the Senate
Carol T. Taniguchi
Clerk of the Senate